Hawaii statutes.
[§356D-152] Housing owner; defined. As
used in this part, the term "housing owner" means:

(1) A private nonprofit corporation or other private
nonprofit legal entity, a limited dividend corporation or other limited
dividend legal entity, or a cooperative housing corporation, that is a
mortgagor under section 202, 207, 213, 221(d)(3), 221(d)(5), or 231 of the
United States Housing Act of 1937, as amended, or that conforms to the
standards of those sections but that is not a mortgagor under those sections or
any other private mortgagor under the United States Housing Act of 1937, as
amended, for very low-income, low-income, or moderate‑income family
housing, regulated or supervised under federal or state laws or by political
subdivisions of the State, or agencies thereof, as to rents, charges, capital
structure, rate of return, and methods of operation, from the time of issuance
of the building permit for the project;

(2) Any other owner of a standard housing unit or
units deemed qualified by the authority; and

(3) The authority. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next